Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the School District Property Tax Relief Act is to provide property tax relief for property taxes levied against real property by school districts. The property tax relief will be made to owners of real property in the form of a property tax credit.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 10.